Massachusetts, session 194th, H2270.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: As of the effective date of this act, the elected incumbent town clerk shall 
continue to serve in such elected position for the term for which she was elected. The town clerk 
shall, during this period, be subject to the call of the appointing authority for the position as forth 
in the Town of Avon Town Charter. Upon the expiration of such elected term, the elected office 
shall be abolished; provided, however, that the elected incumbent holding office as of the 
effective date of this act shall become the first appointed clerk under this Act. If the elected 
incumbent removes from office prior to the expiration of the elected term, the elected position 
shall thereupon be abolished and such office filled in accordance with appointing procedures as 
set forth in the Town of Avon Town Charter. 
SECTION 2: The Town of Avon Town Charter shall be amended by striking out the 
existing Section 3-4(a) “Term of Office” and replacing said section with the following language 

of 2 12 “Appointment, Term of Office - There shall be a town clerk, appointed by the Select Board, to 
serve for a term of three years.” 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.